Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201666-1501
Act, how cited.

Sections
66-1501 to 66-1531 shall be known and
may be cited as the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Act.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 409, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 116;

Laws 1996, LB 1226, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 26;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 103;

Laws 2010, LB832, § 1.